test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_cuijooh_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čuijooh: # ok
    čuijooh+N+Sg+Nom: čuijooh
    čuijooh+N+Sg+Gen: čuijooh
    čuijooh+N+Sg+Acc: čuijooh
    čuijooh+N+Sg+Ill: čujohân
    čuijooh+N+Sg+Loc: čujohist
    čuijooh+N+Sg+Com: čujoháin
    čuijooh+N+Sg+Abe: čuijoohttáá
    čuijooh+N+Ess: čujohin
    čuijooh+N+Par: čujohid
    čuijooh+N+Pl+Nom: čujoheh
    čuijooh+N+Pl+Gen: čujohij
    čuijooh+N+Pl+Acc: čujohijd
    čuijooh+N+Pl+Ill: čujoháid
    čuijooh+N+Pl+Loc: čujohijn
    čuijooh+N+Pl+Com: čujohijguin
    čuijooh+N+Pl+Abe: čujohijttáá
